Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB521.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3702(a) of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 3702. Alimony pendente lite, counsel fees and expenses.(a) General rule.--[In proper cases, upon petition, the] The court may allow a spouse reasonable alimony pendente lite[,] or spousal support [and reasonable counsel fees and expenses.] upon determining that the income and resources of the petitioning spouse are insufficient to provide for that spouse's basic needs, including the costs of prosecuting or defending the divorce action. Reasonable counsel fees and expenses may be allowed pendente lite, and the court shall also have authority to award exclusive use of the family home or any other dwelling which is available for use as a residence to either of the 12345678910111213141516171819 parties pendente lite and to direct that adequate health and hospitalization insurance coverage be maintained for the dependent spouse pendente lite. A determination under this section that alimony pendente lite or spousal support is warranted shall not be based solely upon a rule of court providing presumptive guidelines for the calculation of support or upon the party's standard of living during the marriage.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0521PN0514 - 2 - 123456789